Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 3

Industrial Development Loan Program of 1981

4-31-301. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Industrial Development Loan Program of 1981.”

Acts 1981, ch. 453, § 1.

Cross-References. Chapter definitions, §4-31-102.

4-31-302. Program established.

There is hereby established the industrial development loan program, with the purpose of providing loans to small communities in order to finance public facilities that will support industrial development and generate manufacturing jobs in Tennessee.

Acts 1981, ch. 453, § 2.

4-31-303. Participation in program.

Participation in the program shall be limited to:

Local governments of less than twenty-five thousand (25,000) population, according to the latest certified census; and

County governments if the largest community within the county does not exceed fifty thousand (50,000) population, according to the latest certified census, that have unemployment rates that have exceeded the state average for the twelve-month period prior to application, or that have certified per capita income averages that have not exceeded the state average for the twelve-month period prior to application.

Acts 1981, ch. 453, § 3.

Cross-References. For tables of population of Tennessee municipalities, and for U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

4-31-304. Loans — Priority.

Loans under this program shall be made only for projects that are designed to stimulate the growth of manufacturing jobs.

The first priority for loans shall be projects that are related to an industrial location or expansion.

Second priority projects shall be those that create the conditions for future industrial growth.

Eligible projects shall be limited to the following:

Water and sewerage treatment plants that will serve industrial land;

Water distribution lines and sewerage collection lines that will serve industrial land;

The development of industrial land (including ports), with eligible costs to include the following:

Land purchase (including easements);

Site preparation;

Extension of utilities, including, but not limited to, electrical and gas;

Road access; and

Environmental monitoring equipment; and

The construction and renovation of publicly owned industrial buildings.

Acts 1981, ch. 453, § 4.

4-31-305. Loans — Maximum amount.

In order to ensure that as many communities as possible benefit from the program, individual loans shall not exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).

Acts 1981, ch. 453, § 5.

4-31-306. Rules for administration.

The state funding board, in consultation with the Tennessee local development authority and the commissioner of economic and community development, is authorized to promulgate such rules as it deems necessary for the orderly and efficient administration of this part.

Acts 1981, ch. 453, § 6.

4-31-307. Loans — Applications.

Counties or municipalities meeting the requirements of § 4-31-303 are authorized to make application to the commissioner of economic and community development for a loan pursuant to this part.

The commissioner shall review the application.

If, after making such review, the commissioner determines that the applicant is eligible under this part, and the rules promulgated by the state funding board pursuant thereto, the commissioner is authorized to present such application to the state funding board with a request to approve a loan pursuant to this part, and the rules of the state funding board promulgated pursuant thereto.

Acts 1981, ch. 453, § 7.

4-31-308. Loans — Approval — Fund allocation.

The state funding board, in consultation with the authority, is authorized to approve such loan and allocate such funds as may be necessary to meet the requirements stipulated in such loan from moneys appropriated and legally available for such purpose.

Acts 1981, ch. 453, § 8.